Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-120
Telecommunications contract carrier, defined.

Telecommunications contract carrier means a provider of telecommunications service for hire, other than as a common carrier, in Nebraska intrastate commerce.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 21.